District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.09

Private right of action.

(a)

A person aggrieved by a violation of this subchapter, or any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter, by an employer or entity may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction within 3 years after the occurrence of the alleged violation of [this] subchapter. A person whose rights have been violated under this subchapter by an employer or entity is entitled to collect:

(1)

The amount of any wages, salary, employment benefits, or other compensation denied or lost to the person by reason of the violation, plus an additional equal amount in liquidated damages;

(2)

Compensatory damages and an amount up to $500 for each violation of this subchapter or any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter; and

(3)

In the case of unlawful retaliation, all legal or equitable relief as may be appropriate.

(b)

A court may order the following:

(1)

Reinstatement and the payment of back wages;

(2)

Fringe benefits;

(3)

Seniority rights;

(4)

Treble damages for lost wages or benefits; or

(5)

Any combination of the remedies set forth in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection.

(c)

The court shall allow for reasonable attorneys fees and costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.

History

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 209
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1331.11.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.